test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
    býta+V+Inf: býta
    stigbýta+V+Inf: stigbýta
    stigbýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: stigbýtir
    stigbýta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: stigbýtti
    stigbýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: stigbýttu
    stigbýta+V+Sup: stigbýtt
    stigbýta+V+PrfPrc: stigbýttur
    stoypa+V+Inf: stoypa
    stoypa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: stoypir
    stoypa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: stoypti
    stoypa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: stoyptu
    stoypa+V+Sup: stoypt
    stoypa+V+PrfPrc: stoyptur
    stoyta+V+Inf: stoyta
    stoyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: stoytir
    stoyta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: stoytti
    stoyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: stoyttu
    stoyta+V+Sup: stoytt
    stoyta+V+PrfPrc: stoyttur
    meta+V+Inf: meta
    styrkismeta+V+Inf: styrkismeta
    styrkismeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: styrkismetir
    styrkismeta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: styrkismetti
    styrkismeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: styrkismettu
    styrkismeta+V+Sup: styrkismett
    styrkismeta+V+PrfPrc: styrkismettur
    sýta+V+Inf: sýta
    sýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: sýtir
    sýta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: sýtti
    sýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: sýttu
    sýta+V+Sup: sýtt
    sýta+V+PrfPrc: sýttur
    tæna+V+Inf: tæna
    tæna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tænir
    tæna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tæntu
    tæna+V+Sup: tænt
    tapa+V+Inf: tapa
    tapa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tapir
    tapa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tapti
    tapa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: taptu
    tapa+V+Sup: tapt
    tapa+V+PrfPrc: taptur
    mæla+V+Inf: mæla
    tilmæla+V+Inf: tilmæla
    tilmæla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tilmælir
    tilmæla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tilmældi
    tilmæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tilmæltu
    tilmæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tilmældu
    tilmæla+V+Sup: tilmælt
    tilmæla+V+PrfPrc: tilmældur
    lýsa+V+Inf: lýsa
    tinglýsa+V+Inf: tinglýsa
    tinglýsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tinglýsir
    tinglýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tinglýsti
    tinglýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tinglýstu
    tinglýsa+V+Sup: tinglýst
    tinglýsa+V+PrfPrc: tinglýstur
    toyta+V+Inf: toyta
    toyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: toytir
    toyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: toytar
    toyta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: toytti
    toyta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: toytaði
    toyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: toyttu
    toyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: toytaðu
    toyta+V+Sup: toytt
    toyta+V+Sup: toytað
    toyta+V+PrfPrc: toyttur
    toyta+V+PrfPrc: toytaður
    beita+V+Inf: beita
    trábeita+V+Inf: trábeita
    trábeita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: trábeitir
    trábeita+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: trábeitti
    trábeita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: trábeittu
    trábeita+V+Sup: trábeitt
    trábeita+V+PrfPrc: trábeittur
    mæla+V+Inf: mæla
    trámæla+V+Inf: trámæla
    trámæla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: trámælir
    trámæla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: trámældi
    trámæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: trámæltu
    trámæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: trámældu
    trámæla+V+Sup: trámælt
    trámæla+V+PrfPrc: trámældur
    nýta+V+Inf: nýta
    tránýta+V+Inf: tránýta
    tránýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tránýtir
    tránýta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tránýtti
    tránýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tránýttu
    tránýta+V+Sup: tránýtt
    tránýta+V+PrfPrc: tránýttur
    troyta+V+Inf: troyta
    trátroyta+V+Inf: trátroyta
    trátroyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: trátroytir
    trátroyta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: trátroytti
    trátroyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: trátroyttu
    trátroyta+V+Sup: trátroytt
    trátroyta+V+PrfPrc: trátroyttur
    troyta+V+Inf: troyta
    troyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: troytir
    troyta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: troytti
    troyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: troyttu
    troyta+V+Sup: troytt
    troyta+V+PrfPrc: troyttur
    oysa+V+Inf: oysa
    turroysa+V+Inf: turroysa
    turroysa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: turroysir
    turroysa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: turroysti
    turroysa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: turroystu
    turroysa+V+Sup: turroyst
    turroysa+V+PrfPrc: turroystur
    turva+V+Inf: turva
    turva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: turvir
    turva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: turvtu
    turva+V+Sup: turvt
    tveita+V+Inf: tveita
    tveita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tveitir
    tveita+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tveitti
    tveita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tveittu
    tveita+V+Sup: tveitt
    tveita+V+PrfPrc: tveittur
    býta+V+Inf: býta
    tvíbýta+V+Inf: tvíbýta
    tvíbýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tvíbýtir
    tvíbýta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tvíbýtti
    tvíbýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tvíbýttu
    tvíbýta+V+Sup: tvíbýtt
    tvíbýta+V+PrfPrc: tvíbýttur
    læsa+V+Inf: læsa
    tvílæsa+V+Inf: tvílæsa
    tvílæsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tvílæsir
    tvílæsa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tvílæsti
    tvílæsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tvílæstu
    tvílæsa+V+Sup: tvílæst
    tvílæsa+V+PrfPrc: tvílæstur
    reisa+V+Inf: reisa
    tvíreisa+V+Inf: tvíreisa
    tvíreisa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tvíreisir
    tvíreisa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tvíreisti
    tvíreisa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tvíreistu
    tvíreisa+V+Sup: tvíreist
    tvíreisa+V+PrfPrc: tvíreistur
    tvíta+V+Inf: tvíta
    tvíta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tvítir
    tvíta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tvítti
    tvíta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tvíttu
    tvíta+V+Sup: tvítt
    tvíta+V+PrfPrc: tvíttur
    stoyta+V+Inf: stoyta
    tvørstoyta+V+Inf: tvørstoyta
    tvørstoyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tvørstoytir
    tvørstoyta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: tvørstoytti
    tvørstoyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tvørstoyttu
    tvørstoyta+V+Sup: tvørstoytt
    tvørstoyta+V+PrfPrc: tvørstoyttur
    tyrpa+V+Inf: tyrpa
    tyrpa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tyrpir
    tyrpa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tyrptu
    tyrpa+V+Sup: tyrpt
    broyta+V+Inf: broyta
    umbroyta+V+Inf: umbroyta
    umbroyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: umbroytir
    umbroyta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: umbroytti
    umbroyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: umbroyttu
    umbroyta+V+Sup: umbroytt
    umbroyta+V+PrfPrc: umbroyttur
    mæla+V+Inf: mæla
    ummæla+V+Inf: ummæla
    ummæla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ummælir
    ummæla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: ummældi
    ummæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ummæltu
    ummæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ummældu
    ummæla+V+Sup: ummælt
    ummæla+V+PrfPrc: ummældur
    meta+V+Inf: meta
    undirmeta+V+Inf: undirmeta
    undirmeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: undirmetir
    undirmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: undirmetti
    undirmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: undirmettu
    undirmeta+V+Sup: undirmett
    undirmeta+V+PrfPrc: undirmettur
    vísa+V+Inf: vísa
    undirvísa+V+Inf: undirvísa
    undirvísa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: undirvísir
    undirvísa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: undirvísti
    undirvísa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: undirvístu
    undirvísa+V+Sup: undirvíst
    undirvísa+V+PrfPrc: undirvístur
    loysa+V+Inf: loysa
    upploysa+V+Inf: upploysa
    upploysa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: upploysir
    upploysa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: upploysti
    upploysa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: upploystu
    upploysa+V+Sup: upployst
    upploysa+V+PrfPrc: upploystur
    lýsa+V+Inf: lýsa
    upplýsa+V+Inf: upplýsa
    upplýsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: upplýsir
    upplýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: upplýsti
    upplýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: upplýstu
    upplýsa+V+Sup: upplýst
    upplýsa+V+PrfPrc: upplýstur
    nýta+V+Inf: nýta
    úrnýta+V+Inf: úrnýta
    úrnýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: úrnýtir
    úrnýta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: úrnýtti
    úrnýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: úrnýttu
    úrnýta+V+Sup: úrnýtt
    úrnýta+V+PrfPrc: úrnýttur
    hýsa+V+Inf: hýsa
    útihýsa+V+Inf: útihýsa
    útihýsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: útihýsir
    útihýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: útihýsti
    útihýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: útihýstu
    útihýsa+V+Sup: útihýst
    útihýsa+V+PrfPrc: útihýstur
    væta+V+Inf: væta
    væta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vætir
    væta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vætar
    væta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vætti
    væta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vætaði
    væta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vættu
    væta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vætaðu
    væta+V+Sup: vætt
    væta+V+Sup: vætað
    væta+V+PrfPrc: vættur
    væta+V+PrfPrc: vætaður
    vaka+V+Inf: vaka
    vakja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vakir
    vaka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vakir
    vakja+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vakti
    vaka+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vakti
    vekja+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vakti
    vakja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vaktu
    vaka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vaktu
    vekja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vaktu
    vakja+V+Sup: vakt
    vaka+V+Sup: vakt
    vekja+V+Sup: vakt
    vakja+V+PrfPrc: vaktur
    vaka+V+PrfPrc: vaktur
    vekja+V+PrfPrc: vaktur
    býta+V+Inf: býta
    vanbýta+V+Inf: vanbýta
    vanbýta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vanbýtir
    vanbýta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vanbýtti
    vanbýta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vanbýttu
    vanbýta+V+Sup: vanbýtt
    vanbýta+V+PrfPrc: vanbýttur
    meta+V+Inf: meta
    vanmeta+V+Inf: vanmeta
    vanmeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vanmetir
    vanmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vanmetti
    vanmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vanmettu
    vanmeta+V+Sup: vanmett
    vanmeta+V+PrfPrc: vanmettur
    beita+V+Inf: beita
    várbeita+V+Inf: várbeita
    várbeita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: várbeitir
    várbeita+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: várbeitti
    várbeita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: várbeittu
    várbeita+V+Sup: várbeitt
    várbeita+V+PrfPrc: várbeittur
    veita+V+Inf: veita
    varðveita+V+Inf: varðveita
    varðveita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: varðveitir
    varðveita+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: varðveitti
    varðveita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: varðveittu
    varðveita+V+Sup: varðveitt
    varðveita+V+PrfPrc: varðveittur
    veita+V+Inf: veita
    vatnveita+V+Inf: vatnveita
    vatnveita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vatnveitir
    vatnveita+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vatnveitti
    vatnveita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vatnveittu
    vatnveita+V+Sup: vatnveitt
    vatnveita+V+PrfPrc: vatnveittur
    veita+V+Inf: veita
    veita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: veitir
    veita+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: veitti
    veita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: veittu
    veiða+V+Sup: veitt
    veita+V+Sup: veitt
    veita+V+PrfPrc: veittur
    mæla+V+Inf: mæla
    viðmæla+V+Inf: viðmæla
    viðmæla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: viðmælir
    viðmæla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: viðmældi
    viðmæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: viðmæltu
    viðmæla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: viðmældu
    viðmæla+V+Sup: viðmælt
    viðmæla+V+PrfPrc: viðmældur
    løna+V+Inf: løna
    virðisløna+V+Inf: virðisløna
    virðisløna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: virðislønir
    virðisløna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: virðislønar
    virðisløna+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: virðislønaði
    virðisløna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: virðisløntu
    virðisløna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: virðislønaðu
    virðisløna+V+Sup: virðislønt
    virðisløna+V+Sup: virðislønað
    virðisløna+V+PrfPrc: virðislønaður
    meta+V+Inf: meta
    virðismeta+V+Inf: virðismeta
    virðismeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: virðismetir
    virðismeta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: virðismetti
    virðismeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: virðismettu
    virðismeta+V+Sup: virðismett
    virðismeta+V+PrfPrc: virðismettur
    vísa+V+Inf: vísa
    vísa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: vísir
    vísa+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: vísti
    vísa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: vístu
    vísa+V+Sup: víst
    vísa+V+PrfPrc: vístur
    meta+V+Inf: meta
    yvirmeta+V+Inf: yvirmeta
    yvirmeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: yvirmetir
    yvirmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: yvirmetti
    yvirmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: yvirmettu
    yvirmeta+V+Sup: yvirmett
    yvirmeta+V+PrfPrc: yvirmettur
    meiða+V+Inf: meiða
    ærumeiða+V+Inf: ærumeiða
    ærumeiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ærumeiðir
    ærumeiða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: ærumeiddi
    ærumeiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ærumeiddu
    ærumeiða+V+Sup: ærumeitt
    ærumeiða+V+PrfPrc: ærumeiddur
    leiða+V+Inf: leiða
    ættleiða+V+Inf: ættleiða
    ættleiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ættleiðir
    ættleiða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: ættleiddi
    ættleiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: ættleiddu
    ættleiða+V+Sup: ættleitt
    ættleiða+V+PrfPrc: ættleiddur
    oyða+V+Inf: oyða
    aloyða+V+Inf: aloyða
    aloyða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: aloyðir
    aloyða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: aloyddi
    aloyða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: aloyddu
    aloyða+V+Sup: aloytt
    aloyða+V+PrfPrc: aloyddur
    røða+V+Inf: røða
    andrøða+V+Inf: andrøða
    andrøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: andrøðir
    andrøða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: andrøddi
    andrøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andrøddu
    andrøða+V+Sup: andrøtt
    andrøða+V+PrfPrc: andrøddur
    støða+V+Inf: støða
    andstøða+V+Inf: andstøða
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: andstøðir
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: andstøðar
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: andstøddi
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: andstøðaði
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andstøddu
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andstøðaðu
    andstøða+V+Sup: andstøtt
    andstøða+V+Sup: andstøðað
    andstøða+V+PrfPrc: andstøddur
    andstøða+V+PrfPrc: andstøðaður
    arbeiða+V+Inf: arbeiða
    arbeiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: arbeiðir
    arbeiða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: arbeiddi
    arbeiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: arbeiddu
    arbeiða+V+Sup: arbeitt
    arbeiða+V+PrfPrc: arbeiddur
    atkvøða+V+Inf: atkvøða
    atkvøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: atkvøðir
    atkvøða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: atkvøddi
    atkvøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: atkvøddu
    atkvøða+V+Sup: atkvøtt
    atkvøða+V+PrfPrc: atkvøddur
    greiða+V+Inf: greiða
    avgreiða+V+Inf: avgreiða
    avgreiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avgreiðir
    avgreiða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: avgreiddi
    avgreiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avgreiddu
    avgreiða+V+Sup: avgreitt
    avgreiða+V+PrfPrc: avgreiddur
    oyða+V+Inf: oyða
    avoyða+V+Inf: avoyða
    avoyða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avoyðir
    avoyða+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: avoyddi
    avoyða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avoyddu
    avoyða+V+Sup: avoytt
